California statutes. Penal Code
However, no year of conviction shall be made available to the public unless the department also is able to make available the corresponding year of release of incarceration for that offense, and
 the required notation regarding any subsequent felony.

(B) (i) Any state facility that releases from incarceration a person who was incarcerated because of a crime for which the person is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 shall, within 30 days of release, provide the year of release for the person’s most recent offense requiring registration to the Department of Justice in a manner and format approved by the department.

(ii) Any state facility that releases a person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 from incarceration whose incarceration was for a felony committed subsequently to the offense for which the person is required to register shall, within 30 days of release, advise the Department of Justice
 of that fact.

(iii) Any state facility that, prior to January 1, 2007, released from incarceration a person who was incarcerated because of a crime for which the person is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 shall provide the year of release for the person’s most recent offense requiring registration to the Department of Justice in a manner and format approved by the department. The information provided by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be limited to information that is currently maintained in an electronic format.

(iv) Any state facility that, prior to January 1, 2007, released a person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 from incarceration whose incarceration was for a felony committed subsequently to the
 offense for which the person is required to register shall advise the Department of Justice of that fact in a manner and format approved by the department. The information provided by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be limited to information that is currently maintained in an electronic format.

(3) The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide to the Department of Justice the names of all persons committed to its custody pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, within 30 days of commitment, and shall provide the names of all of those persons released from its custody within five working days of release.

(b) (1) With respect to a person who
 has been convicted of the commission or the attempted commission of any of the offenses listed in, or who is otherwise described in, paragraph (2), or who is a tier three offender as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290, the Department of Justice shall make available to the public via the internet website the person’s name and known aliases, a photograph, a physical description, including gender and
 race, date of birth, criminal history, prior adjudication as a sexually violent predator, the address at which the person resides, and any other information that the Department of Justice deems relevant, but not the information excluded pursuant to subdivision (a), except that information about persons required to register as a result of an adjudication as a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 290.008 shall not be made available on the internet website. The department shall also make available to the public via the internet website the person’s static SARATSO risk level, if any, and information on an elevated risk level based on the SARATSO future violence tool. Any registrant whose information is listed on the public internet website on January 1, 2022, by the Department of Justice pursuant to this subdivision, may continue to be included on the public internet website while
 the registrant is placed in the tier-to-be-determined category described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 290.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to the following offenses and offenders:

(A) Section 187 committed in the perpetration, or an attempt to perpetrate, rape or any act punishable under Section 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 288a.

(B) Section 207 committed with intent to violate Section 261, 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 288a.

(C) Section 209 committed with intent to violate Section 261, 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 288a.

(D) Paragraph (2)
 or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261.

(E) Section 264.1.

(F) Section 269.

(G) Subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 286.

(H) Subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 288, provided that the offense is a felony.

(I) Subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 287 or of former Section 288a.

(J) Section 288.3, provided that the offense is a felony.

(K) Section 288.4, provided that the offense is a felony.

(L) Section 288.5.

(M) Subdivision (a) or (j) of Section 289.

(N) Section 288.7.

(O) Any person who has ever been adjudicated a sexually violent predator, as defined in Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(P) A felony violation of Section 311.1.

(Q) A felony violation of subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 311.2.

(R) A felony violation of Section 311.3.

(S) A felony violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 311.4.

(T) Section 311.10.

(U) A felony violation of Section 311.11.

(V) A tier three offender, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290.

(c) (1) With respect to a person who has been convicted of the commission or the attempted commission of any of the offenses listed in, or who is otherwise described in, paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 290 and who is a tier two offender, and with respect to a person who has been convicted of the commission or the attempted commission of Section 647.6, the Department of Justice shall make available to the public via the internet website the person’s name and known aliases, a photograph, a physical description, including gender
 and race, date of birth, criminal history, the community of residence and ZIP Code in which the person resides or the county in which the person is registered as a transient, and any other information that the Department of Justice deems relevant, but not the information excluded pursuant to subdivision (a) or the address at which the person resides, except that information about persons required to register as a result of an adjudication as a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 290.008 shall not be made available on the internet website. Any registrant whose information is listed on the public internet website on January 1, 2022, by the Department of Justice pursuant to this subdivision may continue to be included on the public internet website while the registrant is placed in the tier-to-be-determined category described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 290.

(2) Any registrant whose information was not included on the public internet website on January 1, 2022, and who is placed in the tier-to-be-determined category described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 290 may have the information described in this subdivision made available to the public via the public internet website.

(d) (1) (A) An offender who is required to register pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act may apply for exclusion from the internet website if the offender demonstrates that the person’s only registerable offense is either of the following:

(i) An offense for which the offender successfully completed probation, provided that the offender
 submits to the department a certified copy of a probation report, presentencing report, report prepared pursuant to Section 288.1, or other official court document that clearly demonstrates that the offender was the victim’s parent, stepparent, sibling, or grandparent and that the crime did not involve either oral copulation or penetration of the vagina or rectum of either the victim or the offender by the penis of the other or by any foreign object.

(ii) An offense for which the offender is on probation at the time of the offender’s application, provided that the offender submits to the department a certified copy of a probation report, presentencing report, report prepared pursuant to Section 288.1, or other official court document that clearly demonstrates that the offender was the victim’s parent, stepparent, sibling, or grandparent and
 that the crime did not involve either oral copulation or penetration of the vagina or rectum of either the victim or the offender by the penis of the other or by any foreign object.

(B) If, subsequent to the offender’s application, the offender commits a violation of probation resulting in the offender’s incarceration in county jail or state prison, the offender’s exclusion, or application for exclusion, from the internet website shall be terminated.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “successfully completed probation” means that during the period of probation the offender neither received additional county jail or state prison time for a violation of probation nor was convicted of another offense resulting in a sentence to county jail or state prison.

(2) If the department determines that a person who was granted an exclusion under a former version of this subdivision would not qualify for an exclusion under the current version of this subdivision, the department shall rescind the exclusion, make a reasonable effort to provide notification to the person that the exclusion has been rescinded, and, no sooner than 30 days after notification is attempted, make information about the offender available to the public on the internet website as provided in this section.

(3) Effective January 1, 2012, no person shall be excluded pursuant to this subdivision unless the offender has submitted to the department documentation sufficient for the department to determine that the person has a SARATSO risk level of average, below
 average, or very low as determined by the Coding Rules for the SARATSO static risk assessment instrument.

(e) (1) A designated law enforcement entity, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 290.45, may make available information concerning persons who are required to register pursuant to Section 290 to the public via an internet website as specified in paragraph (2), provided that the information about that person is also displayed on the Department of Justice’s Megan’s Law internet website.

(2) The law enforcement entity may make available by way of an internet website the information described in subdivision (c) if it determines that the public disclosure of the information about a specific offender by way of the entity’s internet website is necessary
 to ensure the public safety based upon information available to the entity concerning the current risk posed by a
 specific offender, including the offender’s risk of sexual or violent reoffense, as indicated by the person’s SARATSO static, dynamic, and violence risk levels, as described in Section 290.04, if available.

(3) The information that may be provided pursuant to this subdivision may include the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 290.45. However, that offender’s address may not be disclosed unless the offender is a person whose address is on the Department of Justice’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) For purposes of this section, “offense” includes the statutory predecessors of that offense, or any offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if committed or attempted to be committed in this state, would have been punishable in this
 state as an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 7921.505 of the Government Code, disclosure of information pursuant to this section is not a waiver of exemptions under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and does not affect other statutory restrictions on disclosure in other situations.

(h) (1) Any person who uses information disclosed pursuant to this section to commit a misdemeanor shall be subject to, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed, a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) Any person who uses information disclosed pursuant to
 this section to commit a felony shall be punished, in addition and consecutive to any other punishment, by a five-year term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(i) Any person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 who enters an internet website established pursuant to this section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(j) (1) A person is authorized to use information disclosed pursuant to this section only to protect a person at risk.

(2) Except as authorized under paragraph (1) or any other provision of law, use of any
 information that is disclosed pursuant to this section for purposes relating to any of the following is prohibited:

(A) Health insurance.

(B) Insurance.

(C) Loans.

(D) Credit.

(E) Employment.

(F) Education, scholarships, or fellowships.

(G) Housing or accommodations.

(H) Benefits, privileges, or services provided by any business establishment.

(3) This section shall not affect authorized access to, or use of, information pursuant to, among other provisions, Sections 11105 and 11105.3 of this code, Section 8808 of the Family Code, Sections 777.5 and 14409.2 of the Financial Code, Sections 1522.01 and 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code.

(4) (A) Any use of information disclosed pursuant to this section for purposes other than those provided by paragraph (1) or in violation of paragraph (2) shall make the user liable for the actual damages, and any amount that may be determined by a jury or a court sitting without a jury, not exceeding three times the amount of actual damage, and not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and attorney’s fees, exemplary damages, or a civil penalty not exceeding twenty-five
 thousand dollars ($25,000).

(B) Whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that any person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of misuse of the information available via an internet website established pursuant to this section in violation of paragraph (2), the Attorney General, any district attorney, or city attorney, or any person aggrieved by the misuse is authorized to bring a civil action in the appropriate court requesting preventive relief, including an application for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the person or group of persons responsible for the pattern or practice of misuse. The foregoing remedies shall be independent of any other remedies or procedures that may be available to an aggrieved party under other provisions of law, including Part 2 (commencing with
 Section 43) of Division 1 of the Civil Code.

(k) The public notification provisions of this section are applicable to every person described in this section, without regard to when the person’s crimes were committed or the person’s duty to register pursuant to Section 290 arose, and to every offense described in this section, regardless of when it was committed.

(l) A designated law enforcement entity and its employees shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this section.

(m) The Attorney General, in collaboration with local law enforcement and others knowledgeable about sex offenders, shall develop strategies to assist members of the public in understanding and using publicly available information
 about registered sex offenders to further public safety. These strategies may include, but are not limited to, a hotline for community inquiries, neighborhood and business guidelines for how to respond to information posted on this internet website, and any other resource that promotes public education about these offenders.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 58) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 333.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

290.47.

The Department of Justice shall record the address at which a registered sex offender resides with a unique identifier for the address. The information for this identifier shall be captured pursuant to Section 290.015 and the identifier shall consist of a description of the nature of the dwelling, with the choices of a single family residence, an apartment/condominium, a motel/hotel, or a licensed facility. Each address and its association with any specific registered sex offender shall be stored by the department in the same database as the registration data recorded pursuant to Section 290.015. The department shall make that information available to the State Department of Social Services or any other state agency when the agency needs the information for law enforcement purposes relating to investigative responsibilities
 relative to sex offenders. This section shall become operative on January 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 55, Sec. 1.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative January 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

290.5.

(a) (1) A person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 and who is a tier one or tier two offender may file a petition in the superior court in the county in which the person is registered for termination from the sex offender registry on or after their next birthday after July 1, 2021, following the expiration of the person’s mandated minimum registration period, or if the person is required to register pursuant to Section 290.008, the person may file the petition in juvenile court on or after their next birthday after July 1, 2021, following the expiration of the mandated minimum registration period. The petition shall contain proof of the person’s current registration as a sex offender.

(2) The petition shall be served on the registering law enforcement agency and the district attorney in the county where the petition is filed and on the law enforcement agency and the district attorney of the county of conviction of a registerable offense if different than the county where the petition is filed. The registering law enforcement agency shall report receipt of service of a filed petition to the Department of Justice in a manner prescribed by the department. The registering law enforcement agency and the law enforcement agency of the county of conviction of a registerable offense if different than the county where the petition is filed shall, within 60 days of receipt of the petition, report to the district attorney and the superior or juvenile court in which the petition is filed regarding whether the person has met the
 requirements for termination pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 290. If an offense which may require registration pursuant to Section 290.005 is identified by the registering law enforcement agency which has not previously been assessed by the Department of Justice, the registering law enforcement agency shall refer that conviction to the department for assessment and determination of whether the conviction changes the tier designation assigned by the department to the offender. If the newly discovered offense changes the tier designation for that person, the department shall change the tier designation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 290 within three months of receipt of the request by the registering law enforcement agency and notify the registering law enforcement agency. If more time is required to obtain the documents needed to make the assessment, the department shall notify the
 registering law enforcement agency of the reason that an extension of time is necessary to complete the tier designation. The registering law enforcement agency shall report to the district attorney and the court that the department has requested an extension of time to determine the person’s tier designation based on the newly
 discovered offense, the reason for the request, and the estimated time needed to complete the tier designation. The district attorney in the county where the petition is filed may, within 60 days of receipt of the report from either the registering law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency of the county of conviction of a registerable offense if different than the county where the petition is filed, or the district attorney of the county of conviction of a registerable offense, request a hearing on the petition if the petitioner has not fulfilled the requirement described in subdivision (e) of Section 290, or if community safety would be significantly enhanced by the person’s continued registration. If no hearing is requested, the petition for termination shall be granted if the court finds the required proof of current registration is presented in the petition, provided that the
 registering agency reported that the person met the requirement for termination pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 290, there are no pending charges against the person which could extend the time to complete the registration requirements of the tier or change the person’s tier status, and the person is not in custody or on parole, probation, or supervised release. The court may summarily deny a petition if the court determines the petitioner does not meet the statutory requirements for termination of sex offender registration or if the petitioner has not fulfilled the filing and service requirements of this section. In summarily denying a petition the court shall state the reason or reasons the petition is being denied.

(3) If the district attorney requests a hearing, the district attorney shall be entitled to present evidence regarding
 whether community safety would be significantly enhanced by requiring continued registration. In determining whether to order continued registration, the court shall consider: the nature and facts of the registerable
 offense; the age and number of victims; whether any victim was a stranger at the time of the offense (known to the offender for less than 24 hours); criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior before and after conviction for the registerable offense; the time period during which the person has not reoffended; successful completion, if any, of a Sex Offender Management Board-certified sex offender treatment program; and the person’s current risk of sexual or violent reoffense, including the person’s risk levels on SARATSO static, dynamic, and violence risk assessment instruments, if available. Any judicial determination made pursuant to this section may be heard and determined upon declarations, affidavits, police reports, or any other evidence submitted by the parties which is reliable, material, and relevant.

(4) If termination from
 the registry is denied, the court shall set the time period after which the person can repetition for
 termination, which shall be at least one year from the date of the denial, but not to exceed five years, based on facts presented at the hearing. The court shall state on the record the reason for its determination setting the time period after which the person may repetition.

(5) The court shall notify the Department of Justice, California Sex Offender Registry, when a petition for termination from the registry is granted, denied, or summarily denied, in a manner prescribed by the department. If the petition is denied, the court shall also notify the Department of Justice, California Sex Offender Registry, of the time period after which the person can file a new petition for termination.

(b) (1) A person required to register as a tier two
 offender, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 290, may petition the superior court for termination from the registry after 10 years from release from custody on the registerable offense if all of the following apply: (A) the registerable offense involved no more than one victim 14 to 17 years of age, inclusive; (B) the offender was under 21 years of age at the time of the offense; (C) the registerable offense is not specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, except subdivision (a) of Section 288; and (D) the registerable offense is not specified in Section 236.1.

(2) A tier two offender described in paragraph (1) may file a petition with the superior court for termination from the registry only if the person has not been convicted of a new offense requiring sex offender registration or an offense described in
 subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 since the person was released from custody on the offense requiring registration pursuant to Section 290, and has registered for 10 years pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 290. The court shall determine whether community safety would be significantly enhanced by requiring continued registration and may consider the following factors: whether the victim was a stranger (known less than 24 hours) at the time of the offense; the nature of the registerable offense, including whether the offender took advantage of a position of trust; criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior before and after the conviction for the registerable offense; whether the offender has successfully completed a Sex Offender Management Board-certified sex offender treatment program; whether the offender initiated a relationship for the purpose of facilitating the offense; and the person’s
 current risk of sexual or violent reoffense, including the person’s risk levels on SARATSO static, dynamic, and violence risk assessment instruments, if known. If the petition is denied, the person may not repetition for termination for at least one year.

(3) A person required to register as a tier three offender based solely on the person’s risk level, pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290, may petition the court for termination from the registry after 20 years from release from custody on the registerable offense, if the person (A) has not been convicted of a new offense requiring sex offender registration or an offense described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 since the person was released from custody on the offense requiring registration pursuant to Section 290, and (B) has registered for 20 years
 pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 290; except that a person required to register for a conviction pursuant to Section 288 or an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 who is a tier three offender based on the person’s risk level, pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290, shall not be permitted to petition for removal from the registry. The court shall determine whether community safety would be significantly enhanced by requiring continued registration and may consider the following factors: whether the victim was a stranger (known less than 24 hours) at the time of the offense; the nature of the registerable offense, including whether the offender took advantage of a position of trust; criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior before and after the conviction for the registerable offense; whether the offender has successfully completed a Sex
 Offender Management Board-certified sex offender treatment program; whether the offender initiated a relationship for the purpose of facilitating the offense; and the person’s current risk of sexual or violent reoffense, including the person’s risk levels on SARATSO static, dynamic, and violence risk assessment instruments, if known. If the petition is denied, the person may not re-petition for termination for at least three years.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 541, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 11.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

290.6.

(a) Fifteen days before the scheduled release date of a person described in subdivision (b), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide to local law enforcement all of the following information regarding the person:

(1) Name.

(2) Community residence and address, including ZIP Code.

(3) Physical description.

(4) Conviction information.

(b) This subdivision shall apply to any person sentenced to the state prison who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 for a conviction of an offense specified in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 290.46 and to any person described in those subdivisions.

(c) For the purpose of this section, “law enforcement” includes any agency with which the person will be required to register upon his or her release pursuant to Section 290 based upon the person’s community of residence upon release.

(d) If it is not possible for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide the information specified in subdivision (a) on a date that is 15 days before the scheduled release date, the information shall be provided on the next business day following that date.

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall notify local law enforcement within 36 hours of learning of the change if the scheduled release date or any of the required information changes prior to the scheduled release date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 501.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.7.

The Department of Corrections shall provide samples of blood and saliva taken from a prison inmate pursuant to the DNA and Forensic Identification Data Base and Data Bank Act of 1998 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 295) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code) to the county in which the inmate is to be released if the county maintains a local DNA testing laboratory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

290.8.

Effective January 1, 1999, any local law enforcement agency that does not register sex offenders during regular daytime business hours on a daily basis, excluding weekends and holidays, shall notify the regional parole office for the Department of Corrections and the regional parole office for the Department of the Youth Authority of the days, times, and locations the agency is available for registration of sex offenders pursuant to Section 290.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 960, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

290.85.

(a) Every person released on probation or parole who is required to register as a sex offender, pursuant to Section 290, shall provide proof of registration to his or her probation officer or parole agent within six working days of release on probation or parole. The six-day period for providing proof of registration may be extended only upon determination by the probation officer or parole agent that unusual circumstances exist relating to the availability of local law enforcement registration capabilities that preclude the person’s ability to meet the deadline.

(b) Every person released on probation or parole who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 shall provide proof of any change or update to his or her registration information to his or her probation officer or parole agent within five working days for so long as he or she is required to be under the supervision of a probation officer or parole agent.

(c) A probation officer or parole agent who supervises an individual who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 shall inform that individual of his or her duties under this section not fewer than six days prior to the date on which proof of registration or proof of any change or update to registration information is to be provided to the probation officer or parole agent.

(d) For purposes of this section, “proof of registration” means a photocopy of the actual registration form. A law enforcement agency that registers an individual as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 who is released on probation or parole and is therefore subject to this section shall provide that individual with proof of his or her registration free of charge when requested by the registrant to fulfill the requirements of this section or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

290.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any state or local governmental agency shall, upon written request, provide to the Department of Justice the address of any person represented by the department to be a person who is in violation of his or her duty to register under Section 290.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

290.95.

(a) Every person required to register under Section 290, who applies for or accepts a position as an employee or volunteer with any person, group, or organization where the registrant would be working directly and in an unaccompanied setting with minor children on more than an incidental and occasional basis or have supervision or disciplinary power over minor children, shall disclose his or her status as a registrant, upon application or acceptance of a position, to that person, group, or organization.

(b) Every person required to register under Section 290 who applies for or accepts a position as an employee or volunteer with any person, group, or organization where the applicant would be
 working directly and in an accompanied setting with minor children, and the applicant’s work would require him or her to touch the minor children on more than an incidental basis, shall disclose his or her status as a registrant, upon application or acceptance of the position, to that person, group, or organization.

(c) No person who is required to register under Section 290 because of a conviction for a crime where the victim was a minor under 16 years of age shall be an employer, employee, or independent contractor, or act as a volunteer with any person, group, or organization in a capacity in which the registrant would be working directly and in an unaccompanied setting with minor children on more than an incidental and occasional basis or have supervision or disciplinary power over minor children. This subdivision shall not apply to a business owner or an independent contractor who does not work directly in an unaccompanied setting with minors.

(d) For purposes of this section, “working directly and in an unaccompanied setting” includes, but is not limited to, providing goods or services to minors.

(e) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, and a violation of this section shall not constitute a continuing offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 307)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

291.

Every sheriff, chief of police, or the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, upon the arrest for any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290, subdivision (a) of Section 261, or Section 44010 of the Education Code, of any school employee, shall, provided that he or she knows that the arrestee is a school employee, do either of the following:

(a) If the school employee is a teacher in any of the public schools of this state, the sheriff, chief of police, or Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall immediately notify by telephone the superintendent of schools of the school district employing the teacher and shall immediately give written notice of the arrest to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and to the superintendent of schools in the county where the person is employed. Upon receipt of the notice, the county superintendent of schools and the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall immediately notify the governing board of the school district employing the person.

(b) If the school employee is a nonteacher in any of the public schools of this state, the sheriff, chief of police, or Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall immediately notify by telephone the superintendent of schools of the school district employing the nonteacher and shall immediately give written notice of the arrest to the governing board of the school district employing the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 536, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

291.1.

Every sheriff or chief of police, or Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, upon the arrest for any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290 or Section 44010 of the Education Code, of any person who is employed as a teacher in any private school of this state, shall, provided that he or she knows that the arrestee is a school employee, immediately give written notice of the arrest to the private school authorities employing the teacher. The sheriff, chief of police, or Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, provided that he or she knows that the arrestee is a school employee, shall immediately notify by telephone the private school authorities employing the teacher of the arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 536, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

291.5.

Every sheriff or chief of police, upon the arrest for any of the offenses enumerated in Section 290 or in subdivision (1) of Section 261 of any teacher or instructor employed in any community college district shall immediately notify by telephone the superintendent of the community college district employing the teacher or instructor and shall immediately give written notice of the arrest to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Upon receipt of such notice, the district superintendent shall immediately notify the governing board of the community college district employing the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

292.

It is the intention of the Legislature in enacting this section to clarify that for the purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 12 of Article I of the California Constitution, a violation of paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, Section 264.1, subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 286, subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 287 or former Section 288a, subdivision (b) of Section 288, or subdivision (a) of Section 289, shall be deemed to be a felony offense involving an act of violence and a felony offense involving great bodily harm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 26.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

293.

(a) An employee of a law enforcement agency who personally receives a report from a person, alleging that the person making the report has been the victim of a sex offense, shall inform that person that the person’s name will become a matter of public record unless the person requests that it not become a matter of public record, pursuant to Section 7923.615 of the Government Code.
